Florida, session 2026, SB860.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 52 53 Section 1.âSection 499.038, Florida Statutes, is created to 54 read: 55 499.038âRegulation of medications containing certain active 56 pharmaceutical ingredients.â 57 (1)âDEFINITION.âAs used in this section, the term 58 âcompounded medicationâ means a customized drug prepared by a 59 licensed pharmacist or licensed physician by combining, mixing, 60 or altering the ingredients of one or more drugs or products, 61 which drug is commonly prescribed if a commercially available 62 medication does not meet a patientâs specific health need. 63 (2)âPROHIBITION.âA person or an entity may not engage in 64 the sale, transfer, or distribution of a compounded medication 65 for weight loss unless the person or entity provides 66 documentation to the department certifying all of the following: 67 (a)âIf a licensed pharmacist or licensed physician 68 compounds the medication pursuant to 21 U.S.C. s. 69 353a(b)(1)(A)(i)(II), that the active pharmaceutical ingredient 70 used is: 71 1.âIdentical to that used in the manufacture of a drug 72 approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration 73 (FDA); and 74 2.âManufactured according to the manufacturing process for 75 that ingredient as specified on the label of a drug approved by 76 the FDA. 77 (b)âThat the active pharmaceutical ingredient is a 78 pharmaceutical-grade product. 79 (c)âThat the active pharmaceutical ingredient is 80 accompanied by a valid certificate of analysis that provides 81 informational material as to the safety and effectiveness of the 82 drugs compounded using the active pharmaceutical ingredient, 83 including the identity and content of the active pharmaceutical 84 ingredient and the identity of each impurity by chemical name 85 and amount present. A certificate of analysis is not valid 86 unless it is accompanied by testing data from the original 87 manufacturing establishment demonstrating that the information 88 on the certificate of analysis is accurate. 89 (d)âThat the active pharmaceutical ingredient was 90 manufactured in a facility that: 91 1.âIs registered with the FDA pursuant to 21 U.S.C. s. 360; 92 and 93 2.âHas been inspected by the FDA as a human drug 94 establishment within the preceding 2 years, and such inspection: 95 a.âIncluded monitoring compliance with current good 96 manufacturing practices for the relevant active pharmaceutical 97 ingredient; and 98 b.âResulted in a âVoluntary Action Indicatedâ or âNo Action 99 Indicatedâ classification under the FDAâs inspection 100 classification system. 101 (e)âThat the person or entity conducted quality control 102 testing of the active pharmaceutical ingredient before its use 103 in a compounded drug to confirm: 104 1.âThe identity and content of the active pharmaceutical 105 ingredient; and 106 2.âThat any impurity present in the active pharmaceutical 107 ingredient has been identified, characterized, quantified, and 108 justified given the product or the productâs intended use. 109 (3)âENFORCEMENT AND PENALTIES.âA person or an entity that 110 violates this section is subject to the following penalties: 111 (a)âA fine of $1,000 per dose of the illegally compounded 112 drug sold, dispensed, transferred, or distributed by the person 113 or entity; and 114 (b)âRevocation of the personâs or entityâs license or 115 permit by the Board of Pharmacy or the department, as 116 applicable. 117 (4)âRULEMAKING.âThe department may adopt rules and conduct 118 inspections as necessary to implement this section. 119 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.